Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Vermont Board of Architects

§ 161.
Creation of Board; appointment of members; term of office; oath of office.

A board of architects is created whose official title shall be “Vermont Board of Architects.”

The Board shall consist of seven members appointed by the Governor as follows: five architects and two public members. All members shall be Vermont residents. The architect members shall have been in active practice in Vermont for not less than three years and shall be in active practice during their incumbency. The public members shall be persons who have no financial interest personally or through a spouse, parent, child, brother, or sister in the activities regulated under this chapter, other than as consumers or possible consumers of its services.

Board members shall be appointed by the Governor pursuant to

3 V.S.A. §§ 129b

and 2004.

Each member shall file with the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation the constitutional oath of office.

Vacancies may be filled in the same manner that initial appointments are made.

No member may be appointed to more than two consecutive terms.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 160

, § 1;

1985, No. 248

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d);

2005, No. 27

, § 16.

§ 162.
Meetings of Board; quorum.

A majority of the members of the Board shall be a quorum for transacting business and all action shall be taken upon a majority vote of the members present and voting.

The provisions of 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 (the Vermont Administrative Procedure Act) relating to contested cases shall apply to proceedings under this chapter.

Fees for the service of process and attendance before the Board shall be the same as the fees paid sheriffs and witnesses in Superior Court.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 248

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2005, No. 27

, § 17.

§ 163.
Repealed.
1985, No. 248 (Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 164.
Powers and duties of Board generally.

The Board shall:

adopt rules, according to the provisions of 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, the Administrative Procedure Act, that are necessary for the performance of its duties;

provide general information to applicants for licensure as architects;

explain appeal procedures to licensees and applicants and complaint procedures to the public;

adopt rules that define the activities that must be completed by an applicant in order to fulfill the experience requirements established by this chapter. Such activities shall be designed to ensure that all applicants acquire experience in critical areas of architecture but shall not be used to limit or unduly delay admission to practice;

inform applicants of their right to register a complaint with the Board and the Office of Professional Regulation if they are unable to obtain the supervision necessary to fulfill the experience requirements of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter. The Board shall monitor the availability of supervised activities to determine that the experience requirements do not become a barrier to entry into the profession;

if applications for licensure by examination are pending, offer examinations at least once each year and pass upon the qualifications of applicants;

use the administrative and legal services provided by the Office of Professional Regulation under 3 V.S.A. chapter 5.

The Board may conduct hearings as provided in 3 V.S.A. chapter 5.

HISTORY:

Amended

1983, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 17(2);

1985, No. 248

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d);

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 165.
Repealed.
1997, No. 145 (Adj. Sess.), § 31.

§§ 166-170.
Repealed.
1985, No. 248 (Adj. Sess.), § 1.